Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2220
Sections; attorneys at law; applicability.

The provisions of sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 shall be applicable to attorneys at law only to the extent and under such terms and conditions as the Supreme Court of the State of Nebraska shall determine to be necessary and appropriate. Articles of incorporation of professional corporations organized to practice law shall contain such provisions as may be appropriate to comply with applicable rules of the court.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 20, p. 561.